Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 4. Committees.

Sec. 24.05.180.
Committees.

Each house shall have standing committees to facilitate the transaction of business in accordance with the rules of the legislature. The rules may provide for the appointment of special committees, as needed, by the presiding officer of each house. The legislature shall provide for the use of joint committees to facilitate and expedite business.

[Repealed by § 7 ch 100 SLA 1963.]

History.

(§ 20 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 143 SLA 1961; am § 7 ch 100 SLA 1963)

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, §§ 53-55.

Sec. 24.05.182.
Review of administrative regulations by standing committees of the legislature.

A standing committee of the legislature may, consistent with the committee’s jurisdiction as provided in the uniform rules of the legislature, review a proposed or adopted regulation, amendment of a regulation, or repeal of a regulation .

[Repealed, § 23 ch. 7 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 23 ch. 7 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 23 ch. 7 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 1 SLA 1982; am §§ 3, 23 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 24.99.001.
Renumbered as AS

24.37.010

in 1982. Renumbered again in 1985.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “may, consistent with the committee’s jurisdiction as provided in the uniform rules of the legislature,” for “furnished notice of a proposed action under AS

44.62.190

shall” substituted “a proposed or adopted regulation” for “the proposed regulation” and deleted “before the date the regulation is scheduled by the department or agency to be adopted, amended, or repealed” at the end; repealed (b) – (d).

Sec. 24.05.184.
Termination of interim committee membership.

When a member of the legislature who serves on a committee created during a between-session interim by either house or its presiding officers, the legislative council or the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, files a declaration of candidacy for an elective office other than that of member of either house of the legislature, and the member has not resigned from membership on the interim committee, the member’s interim committee membership terminates on the date of filing.

History.

(§ 5 ch 11 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

24.05.087

.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.05.186.
Legislative hearings on initiatives certified by the lieutenant governor.

A standing committee of the legislature, selected jointly by the presiding officers of the house of representatives and senate, shall hold at least one hearing on an initiative that the lieutenant governor has determined was properly filed under AS

15.45.160

.

The standing committee selected jointly by the presiding officers of the house of representatives and senate under (a) of this section shall hold at least one hearing under this section within 30 days after the convening of the legislative session preceding the statewide election at which the initiative proposition must appear on the election ballot under AS

15.45.190

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 73 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 16, ch. 73, SLA 2010, this section applies “to an initiative, the application for which is filed with the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.020

on or after September 9, 2010.”

Sec. 24.05.188.
Federal statutes, regulations, presidential executive orders and actions, and secretarial orders and actions.

After receiving a report from the attorney general under AS

44.23.020(h)

that a state law is in conflict with a federal statute, regulation, presidential executive order or action, or secretarial order or action that is unconstitutional or was not properly adopted in accordance with federal statutory authority, the house and senate committees having jurisdiction over judicial matters may each consider whether legislative action is necessary in response to the findings by the attorney general.

History.

(§ 2 ch 53 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings relating to the enactment of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 53, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 53, SLA 2013, makes this section effective June 21, 2013, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.